Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.110

Refusing or canceling registration—Procedure.

(1) If it does not appear to the director that the pesticide is such as to warrant the proposed claims for it or if the pesticide and its labeling and other material required to be submitted do not comply with the provisions of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter, the registrant shall be notified of the manner in which the pesticide, labeling, or other material required to be submitted fails to comply with the provisions of this chapter so as to afford the applicant an opportunity to make the necessary corrections. If, upon receipt of such notice, the applicant does not make the corrections the director shall refuse to register the pesticide. The applicant may request a hearing as provided for in chapter 34.05 RCW.

(2) The director may, when the director determines that a pesticide or its labeling does not comply with the provisions of this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter, cancel the registration of a pesticide after a hearing in accordance with the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 1989 c 380 s 8; 1971 ex.s. c 190 s 11.]